New York, session 2025-2026, S795.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 451 of the agriculture and markets 2 law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the agricul- 3 ture and markets law relating to the definitions of surplus agricultural 4 products and processed products for the purposes of the Nourish New York 5 program, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8690 and A. 9259, 6 is amended to read as follows: 7 2. "Surplus agricultural products" means consumable or edible agricul- 8 tural products grown, produced or harvested in New York, including proc- 9 essed products as defined pursuant to subdivision three of this section, 10 but shall not include beverages containing alcohol. "Surplus agricul- 11 tural products" shall also include New York grown, produced or harvested 12 milk, and milk products, including but not limited to two percent fat 13 milk and whole milk[, two percent fat milk, and other farm produced 14 beverages, with the exception of beverages containing alcohol]. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 16 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the agriculture and 17 markets law relating to the definitions of surplus agricultural products 18 and processed products for the purposes of the Nourish New York program, 19 as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8690 and A. 9259, takes 20 effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02730-01-5